Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 1. Legislative Declaration of Purpose.

Sec. 24.45.010.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.011.
Purpose.

The legislature finds and declares that the operation of responsible representative democracy requires that the fullest opportunity be afforded to the people to petition their government for the redress of grievances and to express freely to individual members of the legislature, to its committees, and to officials of the executive branch, their opinions on pending legislation or administrative actions; and that the people are entitled to know the identity, income, expenditures, and activities of those persons who pay, are paid or reimbursed for expenses, or who make expenditures or other payments in an effort to influence legislative or administrative action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Sec. 24.45.020.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]